Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB323.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 15 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5111. Eligibility for receipt of State resources.(a) Conditions.--A domestic nonprofit corporation or a foreign nonprofit corporation with 200 or more employees in this Commonwealth shall not be eligible for a State contract, State funding or a State grant if the corporation:(1) has violated 29 U.S.C. Ch. 8 (relating to fair labor standards) within the previous five years;(2) has been found guilty of an unfair labor practice in this Commonwealth within the previous five years; or(3) fails to submit to the Department of State current 123456789101112131415161718 bylaws of the corporation, which must provide that at least 20% of the members of the governing board of the corporation are current employees of the corporation and are elected by the employees of the corporation.(b) Applicability.--(1) Subsection (a) shall not apply in the case of health-care-related money payable from the Commonwealth to the domestic nonprofit corporation or foreign nonprofit corporation, which shall include Medicaid reimbursements.(2) This section shall not apply if the condition described in subsection (a)(1) or (2) occurred prior to the effective date of this paragraph.Section 2. The addition of 15 Pa.C.S. § 5111 shall apply to the following:(1) A State contract entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) State funding approved or otherwise made on or after the effective date of this section.(3) A State grant approved on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0323PN0279 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021